test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-puetted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pueʹtted: # Verb 'come/tulla' - full paradigm
     pueʹtted+V+Inf: pueʹtted
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [puäđam, puäʹđam]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [puäđak, puäʹđak]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puätt
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pueʹttep
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pueʹttveʹted
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puäʹtte
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: puäʹđet
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [pueʹttem, puõʹttem]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [pueʹttiǩ, puõʹttiǩ]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [pueʹđi, puõđi] #dot
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [pueʹđim, pueʹđin]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pueʹđid
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pueʹtte, puõʹtte]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: [pueʹtteš, puõʹtteš]
     pueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: puättam
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: pueʹđžem 
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: pueʹđžiǩ
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: pueʹđež
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: [pueʹđžep, pueʹđžim, pueʹđžin]
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: pueʹđžid
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: pueʹđže
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: pueʹđžet
     pueʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: pueʹđže
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: [puäđčem, puäʹđčem]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: [puäđčiǩ, puäʹđčiǩ]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: [puäđči, puäʹđči]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: [puäđčim, puäđčin, puäđčep, puäʹđčim, puäʹđčin, puäʹđčep]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: [puäđčid, puäʹđčid]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: [puäđče, puäʹđče]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: [puäđčeš, puäʹđčeš]
     pueʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [puäđče, puäʹđče]
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: puäʹđas
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: puäʹttep
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: pueʹtted
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: puättaz
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: puäʹđ
     pueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: [puåttu, puõttu]
     pueʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: pueʹttmen
     pueʹtted+V+Actio: [pueʹttem, puäʹttem]
     pueʹtted+V+Act+PrsPrc: pueʹtti
     pueʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: puättam
#     pueʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [puåttum, puõttum]
     pueʹtted+V+VAbess: [pueʹđkani, pueʹđǩeännai]
     pueʹtted+V+Ger+Ess: [puäʹđeen, pueʹđeen]
     pueʹtted+V+Ger+Instr: [puäʹđeeʹl, pueʹđeeʹl]
     pueʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: puättam
